Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Chapter 18. University of Mary Washington.

§ 23.1-1800.
Corporate name; name of the University.

The board of visitors of the University of Mary Washington (the board) is a corporation under the name and style of “The Rector and Visitors of the University of Mary Washington” and has, in addition to its other powers, all the corporate powers given to corporations by the provisions of Title 13.1 except those powers that are confined to corporations created pursuant to Title 13.1. The board shall at all times be under the control of the General Assembly.

The institution shall be known as the University of Mary Washington (the University).

History.

1972, c. 861, § 23-91.34; 2004, cc. 176, 195; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1801.
Membership.

The board shall consist of 12 members appointed by the Governor, of whom at least nine shall be residents of the Commonwealth and at least six shall be alumni of the University.

The alumni association of the University may submit to the Governor a list of at least three nominees for each vacancy on the board, whether the vacancy occurs by expiration of a term or otherwise. The Governor may appoint a member from the list of nominees.

History.

1972, c. 861, §§ 23-91.36, 23-91.37; 2004, cc. 176, 195; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1802.
Meetings; officers; committees.

The board shall meet at the University once a year and at such other times as it determines.

A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum.

At the first meeting after July 1 in every even-numbered year, the board shall appoint from its membership a rector to preside at its meetings, a vice-rector to preside at its meetings in the absence of the rector, and a secretary to preside at its meetings in the absence of the rector and vice-rector.

The board may appoint a pro tempore officer to preside at its meetings in the absence of the rector, vice-rector, and secretary.

Vacancies in the offices of rector, vice-rector, and secretary may be filled by the board for the unexpired term.

Special meetings of the board may be called by the rector or any three members. In either case, the secretary shall give notice of the time of meetings to each member.

At every regular annual meeting of the board, it may appoint an executive committee for the transaction of business in the recess of the board, consisting of at least three and not more than five members, to serve for a period of one year or until the next regular annual meeting.

History.

1972, c. 861, § 23-91.40; 2004, cc. 176, 195; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1803.
Powers and duties.

The board shall appoint all teachers and fix their salaries, provide for the employment of other personnel as required, and generally direct the affairs of the University.

The board may confer degrees and, subject to the provisions of §

23.1-203

, approve new academic programs and discontinue academic programs offered by the University.

History.

1972, c. 861, §§ 23-91.40, 23-91.42, 23-91.43; 2004, cc. 176, 195; 2016, c. 588.